Utah statutes.
54-13-3.   Rules.
The commission shall adopt and enforce rules pursuant to Section 54-13-2
including rules which:
(1)  incorporate the safety standards established under the federal Natural
Gas Pipeline Safety Act that are applicable to intrastate pipeline
transportation; and
(2)  require persons engaged in intrastate pipeline transportation to:
(a)  maintain records and to submit reports and information to the commission
to enable the commission to determine whether the person is acting in
compliance with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; and
(b)  file, with the commission for its approval, a plan for inspection and
maintenance of each pipeline facility.
